test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-viettar_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - viettâr: # 1B 
    viettâr+N+Sg+Nom: viettâr
    viettâr+N+Sg+Gen: viettâr
    viettâr+N+Sg+Acc: viettâr
    viettâr+N+Sg+Ill: vietârân     # vie´târân
    viettâr+N+Sg+Loc: vietârist    # vie´târist
    viettâr+N+Sg+Com: vietâráin    # vie´târáin
    viettâr+N+Sg+Abe: viettârttáá
    viettâr+N+Ess: vietârin        # vie´târin 
    viettâr+N+Par: vietârid        # vie´târid 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Nom: vietâreh     # vie´târeh
    viettâr+N+Pl+Gen: vietârij     # vie´târij
    viettâr+N+Pl+Acc: vietârijd    # vie´târijd 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Ill: vietâráid    # vie´târáid 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Loc: vietârijn    # vie´târijn 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Com: vietârijguin # vie´târijguin
    viettâr+N+Pl+Abe: vietârijttáá # vie´târijttáá
